Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.781

Manufacturing—Industrial policy advisor.

(1) The department of commerce must appoint an industrial policy advisor to ensure that Washington state fully leverages available federal funding for manufacturing to meet the state's economic development goals in RCW 43.330.760 and the statutory greenhouse gas emissions reductions in RCW 70A.45.020 and guide the implementation of the state industrial strategy created pursuant to RCW 43.330.780.

(2) The industrial policy advisor must:

(a) Track federal and other funding opportunities to transform and strengthen existing Washington manufacturers and promote the growth of new and emerging industries;

(b) Alert Washington manufacturers to relevant federal and other funding opportunities;

(c) Support Washington manufacturers in applying for federal and other funding opportunities and in completing required reporting;

(d) Work to ensure that Washington's pursuit of its goals in RCW 43.330.760 and 70A.45.020 are aligned and mutually reinforcing;

(e) Foster interagency and coordination and collaboration, including with the department of commerce sector leads, on manufacturing-related policymaking and activities, including both climate and economic development manufacturing-related policymaking;

(f) Coordinate with the workforce innovation sector lead, particularly with respect to building the manufacturing workforce pipeline; and

(g) Provide quarterly reports to the manufacturing council created in RCW 43.330.762.

(3) The industry policy advisor may also:

(a) Form expert committees with industry representatives to develop sector-specific strategies for attracting new investment and transforming and strengthening existing manufacturing consistent with the industrial strategy created pursuant to RCW 43.330.780;

(b) Assist local governments with economic plans to attract new investment and transform and strengthen existing manufacturing consistent with the industrial strategy created pursuant to RCW 43.330.780; and

(c) Support communities negatively impacted by the closure or relocation of manufacturing facilities by supporting efforts to attract new investment consistent with the industrial strategy created pursuant to RCW 43.330.780 and facilitate the movement of existing skilled manufacturing workers into new industrial sectors.

[ 2023 c 322 s 3.]

NOTES:

Short title—2023 c 322: See note following RCW 43.330.780.